Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1437.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of excluded tangible personal property during the exclusion period by a purchaser for nonbusiness use. Before July 10 of each year, the department 12345678910111213141516171819202122 shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website a list of the excluded tangible personal property qualifying for the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause:(i) "Excluded tangible personal property" means:(A) clothing accessories, including, but not limited to, hats, scarves, hosiery and handbags;(B) footwear, including footwear normally worn for formal, sport or athletic purposes;(C) school supplies, including, but not limited to, pens, pencils, paper, binders, notebooks, books, bookbags, lunchboxes and calculators;(D) computers, printers and printer supplies and computer software; and(E) bath wash cloths, blankets, bed spreads, bed linens, sheet sets, comforter sets, bath towels, shower curtains, bath rugs and mats, pillows and pillow cases.(ii) "Exclusion period" means the period beginning 12:01 a.m. on the first Friday in August and ending at twelve midnight the following Sunday.(iii) "Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1437PN1676 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324